Tennessee, session 114, SB0571.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 24-5-113(a)(3), is amended by
deleting "four thousand dollars ($4,000)" and substituting "ten thousand dollars ($10,000)".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0571
001362
- 1 -